src-fst-morphology-affixes-pronouns.lexc.md
Pronoun inflection
Livvi pronouns inflect for case.

### DEMONSTRATIVE PRONOUNS

LEXICON PRON_TÄMÄ tämä:tä

LEXICON PRON-DEM_NÄMMÄ nämmä:nämmä

LEXICON PRON-DEM_NET net:n

### INDEFINITE
LEXICON PRON-INDEF_ Still requires work

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_KEN kentahto:ke

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_KUDAI kudaitahto:kuda

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_MI mitahto:mi

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_MITTUINE mittuinetahto:mittu

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_NIMI nimi:ni«mi

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_NIKEN niken:ni«ke

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_NIMITTUINE nimittuine:ni«mittu

### INTERROGATIVE
LEXICON PRON-INTERR_ Still requires work

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_MI mi:mi

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_MITTUINE mittuine:mittu

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_KEN ken:ke

### REFLEXIVE PRONOUNS
**LEXICON PRON-REFL_** iče:ičče
iččiedäh, iččedäh, iččeh, ičes, iččenäh, iččiedäs, iččeni,

### RELATIVE PRONOUNS
LEXICON PRON-REL_KUDAI kudai:kuda

LEXICON PRON_ARMAS armas:arma

LEXICON PRON_OZA oza:oza

LEXICON PRON-QNT_KIELI kieli:kiel

LEXICON PRON_TOINE toine:to

LEXICON PRON_KAI requires developing

LEXICON PRON_ENÄMBI enämbi:enämb

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-olo/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc)</small>

---
